Utah statutes.
72-3-203.   State park access highways -- Escalante State Park to Huntington
State Park.
State park access highways include:
(1)  ESCALANTE STATE PARK.  Access to Escalante State Park begins in Garfield
County at State Highway 12 and proceeds northwesterly on a county road a
distance of 1 mile to the park's visitor center and is under the jurisdiction
of Garfield County.
(2)  FORT BUENAVENTURA STATE PARK.  Access to Fort Buenaventura State Park is
at the visitor center/contact station in Weber County at 2450 A Avenue in
Ogden.  No access road is defined.
(3)  FREMONT INDIAN STATE PARK.  Access to the Fremont Indian State Park
begins in Sevier County at the Sevier Junction on Highway 89 and proceeds
westerly on county road 2524 to interchange 17 on Interstate 70, a distance of
5.9 miles and is under the jurisdiction of Sevier County.
(4)  GOBLIN VALLEY STATE PARK (East Access).  The East Access to the Goblin
Valley State Park begins in Emery County at the junction of State Highway 24
and county road 1012 and proceeds westerly on county road 1012, a distance of
5.2 miles; then southerly on county road 1013, a distance of 6.0 miles; then
southerly on county road 1014, a distance of 0.4 miles to the park entrance.
The East Access is under the jurisdiction of Emery County.
(5)  GOBLIN VALLEY STATE PARK (North Access).  The North Access to the Goblin
Valley State Park begins in Emery County at the junction of Interstate 70 and
county road 332 and proceeds southwesterly on county road 332, a distance of
10 miles; then southerly on county road 1033, a distance of 3.1 miles; then
southeasterly on county road 1012, a distance of 10.6 miles; then southerly on
county road 1013, a distance of 6.0 miles; then southerly on county road 1014,
a distance of 0.4 miles to the park entrance.  The North Access is under the
jurisdiction of Emery County.
(6)  GOOSENECKS STATE PARK.  Access to Goosenecks State Park begins in San
Juan County at State Highway 261 and proceeds southwesterly on State Highway
316 a distance of 3.6 miles to the parking area and overlook at the park and
is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.
(7)  ANTELOPE ISLAND STATE PARK.  Access to Antelope Island State Park begins
in Davis County at State Highway 127 and proceeds southwesterly on a county
road a distance of 7.2 miles to the parking area and marina at the park and is
under the jurisdiction of Davis County.
(8)  GREAT SALT LAKE STATE PARK.  Access to the Great Salt Lake State Park
begins in Salt Lake County at Interstate Highway 80 and proceeds southwesterly
on a county road a distance of 1.5 miles to the parking area and marina at the
park and is under the jurisdiction of Salt Lake County.
(9)  GREEN RIVER STATE PARK.  Access to Green River State Park begins in Emery
County at the junction of Route 19 and Green River Boulevard and proceeds
southerly on Green River Boulevard, a distance of 0.5 miles to the park
entrance and is under the jurisdiction of Green River.
(10)  GUNLOCK STATE PARK.  Access to the Gunlock State Park begins in
Washington County at the junction of county road (L009) and a county road and
proceeds northwesterly on a county road a distance of 0.1 miles to the parking
area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of Washington County.
(11)  HUNTINGTON STATE PARK.  Access to the Huntington State Park begins in
Emery County at State Highway 10 and proceeds northwesterly on a county road a
distance of 0.3 miles to the park entrance and is under the jurisdiction of
Emery County.
